Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.850

Students experiencing homelessness and foster youth program.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1540.SL) ***

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, each public four-year institution of higher education may implement a program to provide assistance to students experiencing homelessness and to students who were in the foster care system when they graduated high school. The program must provide certain accommodations to these students that may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Access to laundry facilities;

(b) Access to storage;

(c) Access to locker room and shower facilities;

(d) Reduced-price meals or meal plans, and access to food banks;

(e) Access to technology;

(f) Access to short-term housing or housing assistance, especially during seasonal breaks; and

(g) Case management services.

(2) The four-year institutions of higher education may also establish plans to develop surplus property for affordable housing to accommodate the needs of students experiencing homelessness and students who were in the foster care system when they graduated high school.

(3) The four-year institutions of higher education participating in the program shall leverage existing community resources by making available to students in the program information that is available for individuals experiencing homelessness, including through not-for-profit organizations, the local housing authority, and the department of commerce's office of homeless youth.

(4) The four-year institutions of higher education participating in the program shall annually provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 beginning December 1, 2023, that includes at least the following information:

(a) The number of students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity, and the number of students who were in the foster care system when they graduated high school who attended a four-year institution of higher education during the program. The council shall coordinate with all of the four-year institutions of higher education to collect voluntary data on how many students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity are attending the four-year institutions of higher education;

(b) The number of students assisted by the program;

(c) Strategies for accommodating students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity, and former foster care students; and

(d) Legislative recommendations for how students experiencing homelessness or food insecurity, and former foster care students could be better served.

(5) For purposes of this section, "program" means the students experiencing homelessness and foster youth program.

[2023 c 339 s 2; 2021 c 62 s 2; 2019 c 330 s 2.]